New York, session 2025-2026, A4665.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 396-z of the general business law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 13-b to read as follows: 3 13-b. A rental vehicle company shall not impose any fees, charges or 4 penalties, other than the actual cost of a toll, on an authorized driver 5 for such driver's use of a rental vehicle through a toll collection 6 facility that utilizes an electronic toll collection system, as defined 7 in section twenty-nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 8 law, or a photo-monitoring system for the payment of tolls. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law; provided that the amendments to section 396-z of the 11 general business law made by section one of this act shall survive the 12 expiration and reversion of such section as provided in section 4 of 13 chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, as amended. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06144-02-5